sk-SK: Typ uchytenia výškového reproduktora: Montáž na A-stĺpik; Uhlová montáž; Montáž na palubnú dosku; Zapustená montáž; OEM náhrada; Montáž do puzdra; Montáž na vnútorný kryt zrkadla; Povrchová montáž; Univerzálna (obsahuje viaceré držiaky); Iná
el: Τύπος βάσης tweeter: Τοποθέτηση σε κολόνα Α; Γωνιακή τοποθέτηση; Τοποθέτηση σε ταμπλό; Χωνευτή τοποθέτηση; Αντικατάσταση OEM; Τοποθέτηση σε pod; Τοποθέτηση σε πάνελ καθρέπτη (sail panel); Εξωτερική τοποθέτηση; Γενικής χρήσης (περιλαμβάνονται πολλές βάσεις); Άλλο
sv: Diskantmonteringstyp: A-stolpsmontering; Vinklad montering; Montering på instrumentbräda; Planmontering; OEM-ersättning; Kapselmontering; Montering på fönsterstolpe; Ytmontering; Universell (flera fästen ingår); Annat
fi: Diskanttikaiuttimen asennustapa: A-pilariasennus; Kulma-asennus; Kojelauta-asennus; Uppoasennus; OEM-korvaava; Koteloasennus; Peilikolmioasennus; Pinta-asennus; Yleiskäyttöinen (sisältää useita kiinnikkeitä); Muu
cs: Typ uchycení výškového reproduktoru: Montáž na A-sloupek; Úhlová montáž; Montáž na palubní desku; Zapuštěná montáž; OEM náhrada; Montáž do krytu (podu); Montáž na kryt zrcátka; Povrchová montáž; Univerzální (obsahuje více možností montáže); Ostatní
pl: Typ montażu tweetera: Montaż w słupku A; Montaż kątowy; Montaż na desce rozdzielczej; Montaż wpuszczany; Zamiennik OEM; Montaż w obudowie; Montaż w trójkącie lusterka; Montaż powierzchniowy; Uniwersalny (wiele uchwytów w zestawie); Inne
da: Monteringstype for tweeter: Montering på A-stolpe; Vinkelmontering; Montering på instrumentbræt; Planmontering; OEM-udskiftning; Pod-montering; Sail panel-montering; Overflademontering; Universel (flere beslag medfølger); Andet
es: Tipo de montaje del tweeter: Montaje en pilar A; Montaje en ángulo; Montaje en el tablero; Montaje al ras; Reemplazo de OEM; Montaje en cápsula; Montaje en el panel del retrovisor; Montaje en superficie; Universal (incluye múltiples soportes); Otro
ja: ツイーターマウントタイプ: Aピラーマウント; アングルマウント; ダッシュマウント; フラッシュマウント; 純正リプレイスメント; ポッドマウント; セイルパネルマウント; サーフェスマウント; ユニバーサル (複数マウント付属); その他
ro-RO: Tip de montare a tweeterului: Montare pe stâlpul A; Montare în unghi; Montare pe bord; Montare la nivel; Înlocuire OEM; Montare în capsulă; Montare pe panoul triunghiular; Montare pe suprafață; Universală (mai multe suporturi incluse); Altele
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на високочестотния говорител: Монтаж на А-колоната; Ъглов монтаж; Монтаж на таблото; Монтаж наравно (скрит); OEM заместител; Монтаж в капсула; Монтаж на триъгълника на огледалото; Повърхностен монтаж; Универсален (включени множество стойки); Друг
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže visokotonca: Montaža na A-stup; Montaža pod kutom; Montaža na instrumentnu ploču; Montaža u ravnini; Zamjena za original (OEM); Montaža u kućište; Montaža na trokut vrata; Površinska montaža; Univerzalno (uključeno više nosača); Ostalo
it: Tipo di fissaggio del tweeter: Montaggio su montante anteriore; Montaggio angolare; Montaggio a cruscotto; Montaggio a incasso; Ricambio OEM; Montaggio su pod; Montaggio su pannello specchietto; Montaggio superficiale; Universale (diversi supporti inclusi); Altro
zh-CN: 高音单元安装类型: A 柱安装; 倾斜安装; 仪表板安装; 齐平安装; OEM 替换; 吊舱安装; 车门三角板安装; 表面安装; 通用（包含多种底座）; 其他
tr: Tweeter montaj tipi: A sütunu montajı; Açılı montaj; Konsol montajı; Gömme montaj; OEM değişimi; Pod montajı; Ayna arkası panel montajı; Yüzey montajı; Evrensel (birden fazla montaj aparatı dahil); Diğer
de: Montageart des Hochtöners: A-Säulen-Montage; Winkelmontage; Armaturenbrett-Montage; Einbaumontage (flächenbündig); OEM-Ersatz; Pod-Montage; Spiegeldreieck-Montage; Aufbaumontage; Universal (mehrere Halterungen enthalten); Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže visokotonskega zvočnika: Namestitev na A-stebriček; Kotna namestitev; Namestitev na armaturno ploščo; Vgradna namestitev; Zamenjava OEM; Namestitev v ohišje; Namestitev na oblogo ogledala; Površinska namestitev; Univerzalno (vključenih več nosilcev); Drugo
nb: Diskantmonteringstype: A-stolpe-montering; Vinkelmontering; Dashbordmontering; Innfelt montering; OEM-erstatning; Pod-montering; Seilpanel-montering; Overflatemontering; Universell (flere fester inkludert); Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do tweeter: Montagem no pilar A; Montagem em ângulo; Montagem no painel de instrumentos; Montagem embutida; Substituição OEM; Montagem em pod; Montagem no painel da porta; Montagem saliente; Universal (vários suportes incluídos); Outro
en: Tweeter mount type: A-pillar mount; Angle mount; Dash mount; Flush mount; OEM replacement; Pod mount; Sail panel mount; Surface mount; Universal (multiple mounts included); Other
nl: Tweeter montagetype: A-stijlbevestiging; Hoekbevestiging; Dashboardbevestiging; Verzonken bevestiging; OEM-vervanging; Podbevestiging; Spiegelkapbevestiging; Opbouwbevestiging; Universeel (meerdere bevestigingen inbegrepen); Anders
fr: Type de montage du haut-parleur d’aigus: Montage sur montant de pare-brise; Montage en angle; Montage sur tableau de bord; Montage encastré; Remplacement d’origine; Montage en nacelle; Montage sur cache-rétroviseur; Montage en surface; Universel (plusieurs supports inclus); Autre
ru: Тип крепления твитера: Крепление на переднюю стойку; Угловое крепление; Крепление на приборную панель; Установка заподлицо; Замена OEM-детали; Крепление в подиум; Крепление в уголок зеркала; Накладной монтаж; Универсальное (несколько креплений в комплекте); Другое
hu: Magassugárzó rögzítési típusa: A-oszlopra szerelhető; Döntve szerelhető; Műszerfalra szerelhető; Süllyesztve szerelhető; Gyári (OEM) cseredarab; Külön házba szerelhető; Tükörháromszögre szerelhető; Felületre szerelhető; Univerzális (többféle rögzítő mellékelve); Egyéb
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งทวีตเตอร์: เมานท์เสา A; เมานท์แบบปรับมุม; เมานท์คอนโซลหน้า; เมานท์แบบฝัง; อะไหล่เปลี่ยนทดแทน OEM; เมานท์แบบพ็อด; เมานท์แผงกระจกมองข้าง; เมานท์แบบติดพื้นผิว; แบบอเนกประสงค์ (รวมเมานท์หลายแบบ); อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Aukštųjų dažnių garsiakalbio tvirtinimo tipas: Tvirtinamas prie A statramsčio; Kampinis tvirtinimas; Tvirtinamas prietaisų skydelyje; Įleidžiamas tvirtinimas; OEM pakaitalas; Tvirtinamas ant laikiklio; Tvirtinamas ant veidrodėlio dangtelio; Paviršinis tvirtinimas; Universalus (pridedami keli tvirtinimo elementai); Kita
ko: 트위터 장착 유형: A 필러 마운트; 앵글 마운트; 대시 마운트; 플러시 마운트; OEM 교체품; 포드 마운트; 세일 패널 마운트; 표면 마운트; 범용(여러 마운트 포함); 기타
zh-TW: 高音揚聲器安裝類型: A 柱安裝; 傾角安裝; 儀表板安裝; 嵌入式安裝; 原廠替換; 底座安裝; 車門三角板安裝; 表面安裝; 通用 (含多種安裝配件); 其他
pt-BR: Tweeter tipo de montagem: Montagem na coluna A; Montagem angular; Montagem no painel; Montagem embutida; Substituição OEM; Montagem em cápsula; Montagem na moldura do retrovisor; Montagem em superfície; Universal (vários suportes incluídos); Outro
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt loa tweeter: Gắn cột A; Gắn góc; Gắn bảng điều khiển; Gắn chìm; Thay thế OEM; Gắn hộp; Gắn ốp chân gương; Gắn nổi; Phổ thông (bao gồm nhiều loại giá gắn); Khác